Washington statutes.
RCW 15.37.070

Denial, suspension, revocation of license.

The director is authorized to deny, suspend, or revoke the license provided for in RCW 15.37.030 subsequent to a hearing in any case in which he or she finds that there has been a failure or refusal to comply with the provisions of this chapter or rules adopted hereunder.

[ 2010 c 8 s 6055; 1961 c 285 s 7.]